src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
|              Flag diacritic | Explanation
|              :------------- |:-----------
|  @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files

* **LEXICON Root** is the basic lexicon starting everything

**Abbreviation**

* **LEXICON Acronym**

* **LEXICON ProperNoun**

Lexicon ENDLEX
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:

@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ ENDLEX2 ;

The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is used to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

**ENDLEX2**

**ENDLEX3**

**ENDLEX4**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
